District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

7-1902

Limitations on applicability.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 14, 1985, D.C. Law 5-156, § 3, 32 DCR 13
Mar. 8, 2006, D.C. Law 16-67, § 2(b), 53 DCR 40

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-2502.

Editor's Notes

Delayed application of Law 5-156: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 7-1901.